Utah statutes.
63L-6-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Governmental entity" is as defined in Section 59-2-511.

(2)  "Net proceeds" means the proceeds from the sale of public lands, after subtracting expenses incident to the sale of the public lands.

(3)  "Public lands" means lands within the exterior boundaries of this state except:

(a)  lands to which title is held by a person who is not a governmental entity;

(b)  lands owned or held in trust by this state, a political subdivision of this state, or an independent entity;

(c)  lands reserved for use by the state system of public education as described in Utah Constitution Article X, Section 2, or a state institution of higher education listed in Section 53B-1-102;

(d)  school and institutional trust lands as defined in Section 53C-1-103;

(e)  lands within the exterior boundaries as of January 1, 2012, of the following that are designated as national parks:

(i)  Arches National Park;

(ii)  Bryce Canyon National Park;

(iii)  Canyonlands National Park;

(iv)  Capitol Reef National Park; and

(v)  Zion National Park;

(f)  lands within the exterior boundaries as of January 1, 2012, of the following national monuments managed by the National Park Service as of January 1, 2012:

(i)  Cedar Breaks National Monument;

(ii)  Dinosaur National Monument;

(iii)  Hovenweep National Monument;

(iv)  Natural Bridges National Monument;

(v)  Rainbow Bridge National Monument; and

(vi)  Timpanogos Cave National Monument;

(g)  lands within the exterior boundaries as of January 1, 2012, of the Golden Spike National Historic Site;

(h)  lands within the exterior boundaries as of January 1, 2012, of the following wilderness areas located in the state that, as of January 1, 2012, are designated as part of the National Wilderness Preservation System under the Wilderness Act of 1964, 16 U.S.C.  1131 et seq.:

(i)  Ashdown Gorge Wilderness;

(ii)  Beartrap Canyon Wilderness;

(iii)  Beaver Dam Mountains Wilderness;

(iv)  Black Ridge Canyons Wilderness;

(v)  Blackridge Wilderness;

(vi)  Box-Death Hollow Wilderness;

(vii)  Canaan Mountain Wilderness;

(viii)  Cedar Mountain Wilderness;

(ix)  Cottonwood Canyon Wilderness;

(x)  Cottonwood Forest Wilderness;

(xi)  Cougar Canyon Wilderness;

(xii)  Dark Canyon Wilderness;

(xiii)  Deep Creek Wilderness;

(xiv)  Deep Creek North Wilderness;

(xv)  Deseret Peak Wilderness;

(xvi)  Doc's Pass Wilderness;

(xvii)  Goose Creek Wilderness;

(xviii)  High Uintas Wilderness;

(xix)  LaVerkin Creek Wilderness;

(xx)  Lone Peak Wilderness;

(xxi)  Mount Naomi Wilderness;

(xxii)  Mount Nebo Wilderness;

(xxiii)  Mount Olympus Wilderness;

(xxiv)  Mount Timpanogos Wilderness;

(xxv)  Paria Canyon-Vermilion Cliffs Wilderness;

(xxvi)  Pine Valley Mountain Wilderness;

(xxvii)  Red Butte Wilderness;

(xxviii)  Red Mountain Wilderness;

(xxix)  Slaughter Creek Wilderness;

(xxx)  Taylor Creek Wilderness;

(xxxi)  Twin Peaks Wilderness;

(xxxii)  Wellsville Mountain Wilderness; and

(xxxiii)  Zion Wilderness;

(i)  lands with respect to which the jurisdiction is ceded to the United States as provided in Section 63L-1-201 or 63L-1-203;

(j)  real property or tangible personal property owned by the United States if the property is within the boundaries of a municipality; or

(k)  lands, including water rights, belonging to an Indian or Indian tribe, band, or community that is held in trust by the United States or is subject to a restriction against alienation imposed by the United States.



Enacted by Chapter 353, 2012 General Session

